Massachusetts, session 194th, H4058.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 26F½ of chapter 148 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following 6 subsections:-
(g) For the purposes of subsections (h) to (l) inclusive, the following terms shall, unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Board”, the board of state examiners of plumbers and gas fitters established in section
36 of chapter 13.
“Division”, division of professional licensure.
“HVAC”, a heating, ventilation and air conditioning system.
(h) HVAC companies and technicians shall be accountable for negligence or errors that
resulted in bodily harm or death due to carbon monoxide poisoning or any related safety hazards
involving carbon monoxide.
of 2

(i) The board shall have the authority to impose financial penalties, licensure suspension
or licensure revocation on HVAC companies and individual technicians whose negligence or
errors resulted in bodily harm or death due to carbon monoxide.
(j) The board shall: (i) conduct mandatory licensure reviews for HVAC technicians or
companies involved in serious safety incidents involving carbon monoxide related to HVAC
systems; (ii) require a formal investigation and hearing process to ensure due process before
license suspension or revocation; and (iii) establish a clear process for revoking the licenses of
HVAC technicians and companies found guilty of gross negligence or errors that directly result
in harm from carbon monoxide related to HVAC systems.
(k) The division shall create and maintain a publicly accessible online database on its
website listing HVAC companies and individual technicians whose licenses have been
suspended or revoked. The division shall provide details of the violations or incidents leading to
the suspension or revocation of licenses on the online database to ensure transparency and
accountability.
(l) HVAC technicians and companies found guilty of gross negligence or errors that
directly result in harm from carbon monoxide related to HVAC systems shall be prohibited from
obtaining new licenses under a different company name or transferring to another company
without disclosure of past revocations to the division.
of 2